FST Assignment 2/sources/cat2.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+Noun +Masculine +Nominative +Accusative +NominativeOrAccusative +Singular +Plural +Definite +Indefinite

LEXICON Root
	gæmi	Noun1;
	kumAra	Noun1;
	kadi	Noun1;
	gowi	Noun1;
	qApasa	Noun1;

LEXICON Noun1
	+Noun+Masculine:0	Noun2;
	
LEXICON Noun2
	+NominativeOrAccusative+Singular+Definite:yA	#;
	+Nominative+Singular+Indefinite:yek	#;
	+Nominative+Plural:yO			#;
	+Accusative+Plural:yan			#;
